bhojpuri.dix
    <pardef n="खा/__optative_ilA_ea">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इला</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p1" />
            <s n="ea" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इला</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p1" />
            <s n="ea" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ल</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p2" />
            <s n="ea" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ल</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p2" />
            <s n="ea" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ला</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="ea" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>लन</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="ea" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इला</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="f" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p1" />
            <s n="ea" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इला</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="f" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p1" />
            <s n="ea" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>लू</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="f" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p2" />
            <s n="ea" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>लू</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="f" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p2" />
            <s n="ea" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>लै</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="f" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="ea" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>लिन</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="f" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="ea" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="उठ/__optative_ilA_ea">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ीला</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p1" />
            <s n="ea" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ीला</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p1" />
            <s n="ea" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ल</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p2" />
            <s n="ea" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ल</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p2" />
            <s n="ea" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ेला</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="ea" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ेलन</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="ea" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ीला</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="f" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p1" />
            <s n="ea" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ीला</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="f" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p1" />
            <s n="ea" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>Vलू</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="f" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p2" />
            <s n="ea" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>Vलू</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="f" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p2" />
            <s n="ea" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>Vलइ</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="f" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="ea" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>Vलिन</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="f" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="ea" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="प/ी__optative_ilA_ea">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िइला</l>
          <r>ी<s n="v" /><s n="m" /><s n="sg" /><s n="p1" /><s n="ea" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िइला</l>
          <r>ी<s n="v" /><s n="m" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p1" /><s n="ea" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ियVल</l>
          <r>ी<s n="v" /><s n="m" /><s n="sg" /><s n="p2" /><s n="ea" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ियVल</l>
          <r>ी<s n="v" /><s n="m" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p2" /><s n="ea" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ियVला</l>
          <r>ी<s n="v" /><s n="m" /><s n="sg" /><s n="p3" /><s n="ea" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ियVलन</l>
          <r>ी<s n="v" /><s n="m" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="ea" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िइला</l>
          <r>ी<s n="v" /><s n="f" /><s n="sg" /><s n="p1" /><s n="ea" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िइला</l>
          <r>ी<s n="v" /><s n="f" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p1" /><s n="ea" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ियVलु</l>
          <r>ी<s n="v" /><s n="f" /><s n="sg" /><s n="p2" /><s n="ea" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ियVलु</l>
          <r>ी<s n="v" /><s n="f" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p2" /><s n="ea" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ियेले</l>
          <r>ी<s n="v" /><s n="f" /><s n="sg" /><s n="p3" /><s n="ea" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ियेलिन</l>
          <r>ी<s n="v" /><s n="f" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="ea" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="प">
      <i>प</i>
      <par n="प/ी__optative_ilA_ea" />
    </e>
    <e lm="उठ">
      <i>उठ</i>
      <par n="उठ/__optative_ilA_ea" />
    </e>
    <e lm="उठ">
      <i>उठ</i>
      <par n="उठ/__optative_ilA_ea" />
    </e>
    <e lm="खा">
      <i>खा</i>
      <par n="खा/__optative_ilA_ea" />
    </e>
